Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
66-29-135. Effect of payment or delivery of property to treasurer.

On payment or delivery of property to the treasurer under this part, the treasurer, as agent for the state, assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A holder that pays or delivers property to the treasurer in good faith and who has complied with §§66-29-128 and66-29-129 is relieved of liability to the extent of the value of the property so paid or delivered for any claim which then exists or which thereafter may arise with respect to the property and is indemnified against claims in accordance with this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-136. Recovery of property by holder from treasurer.

A holder that pays money to the treasurer under this part may claim reimbursement from the treasurer of the amount paid if the holder:

Paid the money in error; or

After paying the money to the treasurer, paid the money to a person the holder reasonably believed to be entitled to the money.

If a claim for reimbursement under subsection (a) is made for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument, the holder shall submit proof that the instrument was presented and that payment was made to a person the holder reasonably believed to be entitled to payment. The holder may claim reimbursement even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was made after expiration of a period of limitation on the owner's right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order.

If a holder is reimbursed by the treasurer under subdivision (a)(2), the holder may also submit a claim to recover from the treasurer dividends, interest, or other increments under § 66-29-137 that would have been paid to the owner, if the money had been claimed from the treasurer by the owner to the extent that such dividends, interest, or increments were paid by the holder to the owner.

A holder that delivers property other than money to the treasurer under this part may claim the property in the possession of the treasurer by filing a claim under § 66-29-152 together with evidence sufficient to establish that the apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder or that the property was delivered by the holder to the treasurer in error.

The treasurer may determine that an affidavit submitted by a holder is evidence sufficient to establish that the holder is entitled to reimbursement or to recover property under this section.

A holder is not required to pay a fee or other charge for reimbursement or return of property under this section.

Not later than ninety (90) days after receiving a claim from a holder under subsection (a) or (c), the treasurer shall determine whether to approve or deny the claim and notify the holder of the treasurer's determination.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-137. Income or gain realized or accrued on property.

If property other than money is delivered to the treasurer, the owner is entitled to receive from the treasurer income or gain realized or accrued on the property before the property is sold, including, if applicable, dividends, interest, or other increments. If the property was an interest-bearing demand, savings, or time deposit, the treasurer shall pay interest annually at the average annual rate paid on funds in the state pooled investment fund established under §9-4-603. Interest begins to accrue when the property is delivered to the treasurer and ends on the date on which payment is made to the owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-138. Treasurer's options as to custody.

The treasurer may decline to take custody of property reported under § 66-29-123 if the treasurer determines that:

The property has a value less than the estimated expenses of notice and sale of the property; or

Taking custody of the property would be unlawful.

A holder may pay or deliver property to the treasurer before the property is presumed abandoned under this part if the holder:

Sends the apparent owner of the property any notice required by § 66-29-128 and provides the treasurer evidence of the holder's compliance with this subdivision (b)(1);

Includes with the payment or delivery a report regarding the property in accordance with § 66-29-124; and

First obtains the treasurer's consent in a record to accept payment or delivery.

The holder must request the treasurer's consent under subdivision (b)(3) in a record. If the treasurer fails to respond to the request not later than thirty (30) calendar days after receipt of the request, the treasurer is deemed to consent to the payment or delivery of the property and the payment or delivery is considered to have been made in good faith.

Upon payment or delivery of the property under subsection (b), the property is presumed abandoned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-139. Disposition of property having no substantial value.

If the treasurer takes custody of property delivered under this part and later determines that the property has no substantial commercial value or that the cost of disposing of the property will exceed the value of the property, the treasurer may return the property to the holder or destroy or otherwise dispose of the property. No action or proceeding may be brought or maintained against the state or any officer thereof for or on account of any action taken by the treasurer pursuant to this part with respect to such property.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-140. Periods of limitation and repose.

Expiration, before, on, or after July 1, 2017, of a period of limitation on an owner's right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order, does not prevent the property from being presumed abandoned or affect the duty of a holder to file a report or pay or deliver property to the treasurer under this part.

The treasurer shall not commence an action, proceeding, or examination with respect to a duty of a holder under this part more than ten (10) years after the duty arose.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-141. Public sale of property.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-154, not earlier than three (3) years after receipt of property that has been presumed abandoned, the treasurer may sell the property.

A sale under subsection (a) must be preceded by notice to the public of:

The date of the sale; and

A reasonable description of the property.

A sale under subsection (a) must be to the highest bidder:

At a public sale at a location in this state which the treasurer determines to be the most favorable market for the property; or

On the internet or another forum the treasurer determines is likely to yield the highest net proceeds of sale.

The treasurer may decline the highest bid at a sale under subsection (a) and reoffer the property for sale if the treasurer determines the highest bid is insufficient.

If a sale held under this section is to be conducted other than by electronic means, the treasurer must publish not less than one (1) notice of the sale at least three (3) weeks, but not more than five (5) weeks, before the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-142. Disposal of securities.

The treasurer shall sell or otherwise liquidate a security no sooner than thirty-two (32) months, but no later than thirty-six (36) months, after receiving the security and giving the apparent owner notice under § 66-29-130(b)(1) and (2) that the treasurer holds the security.

The treasurer shall not sell a security listed on an established stock exchange for less than the prevailing price on the exchange at the time of sale. The treasurer may sell a security not listed on an established exchange by any commercially reasonable method.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2020, ch. 718, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted “thirty-two (32) months” for “eight (8) months” and “thirty-six (36) months” for “one (1) year”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 718, § 3. June 22, 2020.

66-29-143. [Reserved.]

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the treasurer under this part takes the property free of all claims of the owner, a previous holder, or a person making a claim through the owner or holder. The treasurer shall execute documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership to the purchaser.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-145. Military medal or decoration.

The treasurer, upon receiving military medals, shall hold and maintain the military medals until the original owner or the owner's respective heirs or beneficiaries can be identified and the military medal returned.

The treasurer shall not sell a military medal.

The treasurer, with the consent of the respective organization under subdivision (c)(1), agency under subdivision (c)(2), or entity under subdivision (c)(3), may deliver a military medal held under subsection (a) to be held in custody for the owner, to:

A military veteran's organization qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(19);

The agency that awarded the medal or decoration; or

A governmental entity.

Upon delivery under subsection (c), the treasurer is no longer responsible for safekeeping the medal or decoration.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 285, § 6 provided that §§ 3-5 of the act, which amended former §§66-29-104 and former66-29-115, shall apply to all military medals that are removed from a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository or agency or collateral deposit box after July 1, 2011.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-146. Disposal of funds by treasurer.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the treasurer shall deposit in the general fund of the state all funds received under this part, including proceeds from the sale of property under this part.

The treasurer shall maintain an account with an amount of funds the treasurer reasonably estimates to be sufficient to pay claims allowed under, and the costs of administering, this part for each fiscal year. If the treasurer determines that the amount of claims and administrative costs during a fiscal year exceeds the amount of funds received during such fiscal year, a sum sufficient must be appropriated from the general funds of the state to the treasurer for the payment of such claims and costs.

For funds received under this part for the report year ending December 31, 2016, and for each report year thereafter, the treasurer shall determine each June 30 the amount of such funds remitted by or on behalf of each local government of the state and its agencies which have remained unclaimed for a minimum of eighteen (18) months following their delivery to the treasurer. If the aggregate unclaimed balance exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the treasurer shall, upon request of the local government, pay an amount equal to the aggregate unclaimed balance, less a proportionate share of the cost of administering the program, as determined by the treasurer, to the local government, together with a report of the accounts represented by the funds. The funds must be placed in the local government's general fund, except the local government shall maintain, to the extent necessary, a sufficient amount of the total unclaimed property accounts to ensure prompt payment.

For funds received under this part for the report year ending December 31, 2016, and for each report year thereafter, the treasurer shall determine each June 30 the amount of such funds remitted by or on behalf of each cooperative, as that term is defined in § 65-25-102, that have remained unclaimed for a minimum of eighteen (18) months following the delivery of the cooperative's funds to the treasurer. If the aggregate unclaimed balance exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the treasurer, upon request of the cooperative, shall pay an amount equal to the aggregate unclaimed balance, less a proportionate share of the cost of administering the program, as determined by the treasurer, to the cooperative, together with a report of the accounts represented by the funds. The funds must be placed in the cooperative's general fund, except the cooperative shall maintain, to the extent necessary, a sufficient amount of the total unclaimed property accounts to ensure prompt payment.

For funds received under this part for the report year ending December 31, 2020, and for each report year thereafter, the treasurer shall determine each June 30 the amount of the funds remitted by or on behalf of each telephone cooperative organized under, or otherwise subject to, the Telephone Cooperative Act, compiled in title 65, chapter 29, part 1, and organized for the purpose described in § 65-29-102, that have remained unclaimed for a minimum of eighteen (18) months following the delivery of the telephone cooperative's funds to the treasurer. If the aggregate unclaimed balance exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), then the treasurer, upon request of the telephone cooperative, shall pay an amount equal to the aggregate unclaimed balance, less a proportionate share of the cost of administering the program, as determined by the treasurer, to the telephone cooperative, together with a report of the accounts represented by the funds. The telephone cooperative shall place the funds in the telephone cooperative's general fund as long as the telephone cooperative maintains, to the extent necessary, a sufficient amount of the total unclaimed property accounts to ensure prompt payment. After the unclaimed property funds are returned to the telephone cooperative, the treasurer may continue to list the property on the department of treasury's website and may refer claimants to the telephone cooperative to claim their funds. Within thirty (30) business days after paying a claim under this section, the telephone cooperative shall report to the treasurer the name and address of the individual who received the unclaimed property from the telephone cooperative and the amount received.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2020, ch. 793, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 793, § 2. July 15, 2020.

66-29-147. Retention of records by treasurer.

The treasurer shall:

Record and retain the name and last known address of each person shown on a report filed under § 66-29-123 to be the apparent owner of the property delivered to the treasurer;

Record and retain the name and last known address of each insured or annuitant, and beneficiary, shown on the report;

With respect to each policy of insurance or annuity contract listed in the report of an insurance company, record and retain the policy or account number, the name of the company, and the amount due or paid; and

With respect to each apparent owner listed in the report, record and retain the name of the holder who filed the report and the amount due or paid.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-148. Deduction of administrative costs before deposit of funds.

Before making a deposit of funds received under this part to the general fund of the state, the treasurer may deduct administrative costs, including, but not limited to:

Expenses of custody and disposition of abandoned property;

Costs of mailing, publication, and any other outreach efforts in connection with abandoned property;

Reasonable service charges; and

Expenses incurred in examining records of a putative holder of property and collecting property from a putative holder determined by the treasurer to hold property required to be delivered to the treasurer under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-149. Treasurer as custodian of property for owner.

Property received by the treasurer under this part is held in custody for the benefit of the owner and is not owned by the state.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-150. Superior claim of another state.

If the treasurer knows that property held by the treasurer under this part is subject to a superior claim of another state, the treasurer shall:

Report, and pay or deliver, the property to the other state; or

Return the property to the holder so that the holder may pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The treasurer is not required to enter into a formal agreement to transfer the property to another state under subsection (a).

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-151. When property subject to recovery by another state.

Property held by the treasurer under this part is subject to the right of another state to take custody of the property if:

The property was paid or delivered to the treasurer because the records of the holder did not reflect a last known address of the apparent owner in another state, and:

That state establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in that state; or

Under the law of that state, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The records of the holder did not accurately identify the apparent owner of the property, the last known address of the owner was in another state, and, under the law of that state, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment in that state;

The property was subject to the custody of the treasurer of this state under § 66-29-119 and, under the law of the state of domicile of the holder, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the state of domicile of the holder; or

The property:

Is a sum payable on a traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in another state and delivered to the treasurer under § 66-29-120; and

Under the law of that state, has become subject to a claim of abandonment in that state.

A claim by another state to recover property under this section must be presented in a form prescribed by the treasurer unless the treasurer waives presentation of the form.

The treasurer shall decide whether a claim under this section is valid not later than ninety (90) days after it is presented. If the treasurer determines that another state is entitled under subsection (a) to custody of the property, the treasurer shall approve the claim and pay or deliver the property to that state.

The treasurer may require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim to property.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2017, ch. 461, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 461, § 1 amended subsection (b) of this section, effective from May 25, 2017 until July 1, 2017. The amended version of subsection (b) read as follows: “(b) The commissioner of health shall direct these funds, subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration, to programs designed to enhance health access. The programs may include, but not be limited to, funding for services provided by federally qualified health centers, recruitment incentives, community initiatives, service-linked training opportunities, support for high technology/telecommunications efforts, prevention initiatives, efforts to improve the built environment, strategies to improve the health of the population, and other strategies to expand primary, obstetric and dental health care services in underserved areas. Pursuant to a finding of need by the commissioner, the health access program may also address the lack of adequate access in underserved areas to other health care providers and health care services such as emergency medicine, mental health care, and prevention treatment services for low income, pregnant substance abusers.”

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 461, § 7. May 25, 2017.

66-29-152. Claim of property by person claiming to be owner.

A person claiming to be the owner of property held by the treasurer may file a claim for the property in the format prescribed by the treasurer. The claimant shall verify the claim as to its completeness and accuracy.

The treasurer may waive the requirement in subsection (a) to file a claim and pay or deliver property directly to an agency, local government, public institution of higher education, or local education agency, of this state if:

The entity receiving the property or payment is shown to be the same entity as the apparent owner included on a report filed under § 66-29-123; and

The treasurer reasonably believes the entity is entitled to receive the property or payment.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-153. Approval or denial of claim.

The treasurer shall pay or deliver property to a claimant under § 66-29-152:

If the treasurer receives evidence sufficient to establish to the reasonable satisfaction of the treasurer that the claimant is the owner of the property; or

Upon order of a court in accordance with § 66-29-155.

Not later than ninety (90) days after a claim is filed under § 66-29-152, the treasurer shall approve or deny the claim and give the claimant notice of the decision in a record. If the claim is denied:

The treasurer shall inform the claimant of the reason for the denial and specify what additional evidence, if any, is required for the claim to be approved;

The claimant may file an amended claim with the treasurer or commence an action under § 66-29-155; and

The treasurer shall treat an amended claim as an initial claim filed under § 66-29-152.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-154. Payment or delivery of property or proceeds of sale of property — Claim for debt owed by owner to state.

Not later than thirty (30) days after a claim is approved by the treasurer under § 66-29-153, the treasurer shall pay or deliver to the owner the property or the net proceeds from a sale of the property, together with dividends, interest, or other increments to which the owner is entitled under § 66-29-137. On request of the owner, the treasurer may sell or liquidate a security and pay the net proceeds to the owner, regardless of whether the security has been held by the treasurer for less than thirty-two (32) months or the treasurer has not complied with the notice requirements under § 66-29-142.

Property held by the treasurer is subject to a claim for the payment of an enforceable debt that the owner owes in this state for:

Child support arrearages, including child support collection costs and child support arrearages that are combined with amounts for maintenance;

A civil or criminal fine or penalty, court costs, a surcharge, or restitution imposed by a final order of an administrative agency or court; or

State and local taxes, penalties, and interest that have been determined to be delinquent, or for which notice has been recorded with the applicable taxing authority.

The treasurer may make periodic inquiries with state and local agencies in the absence of a claim filed under § 66-29-152 to determine whether apparent owners included in the unclaimed property records of this state have enforceable debts described in subsection (b). The treasurer shall apply the property or net proceeds from a sale of property held by the treasurer to a debt under subsection (b) of an apparent owner who appears in the records of the treasurer and deliver the amount to the appropriate state or local agency. The treasurer shall notify the apparent owner of the payment.

Before delivery or payment to an owner under subsection (a) of property or net proceeds from a sale of property, the treasurer shall apply the property or net proceeds to a debt under subsection (b) that the treasurer has determined is owed by the owner. The treasurer shall pay the amount to the appropriate state or local agency and notify the owner of the payment.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2020, ch. 718, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “thirty-two (32) months” for “eight (8) months” in the second sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 718, § 3. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

66-29-155. Action by person whose claim is denied or not acted upon.

Not later than one (1) year after filing a claim with the treasurer under §66-29-152, the claimant may commence an action against the treasurer in the chancery court for Davidson County to appeal a claim that has been denied or upon which the treasurer has not acted. A copy of the complaint must be served on the treasurer and the attorney general and reporter. The suit must be tried without a jury. If the chancery court rules against the treasurer, the treasurer shall make payment in accordance with §66-29-153. Any aggrieved party may appeal the decision.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.